dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK-2.5.024.dic
etbær/12,48
eukalyptus/12,48,32
faglitterær/49,12,39
fak/12,46,6
feberagtig/24,12,49
fejl/12,4,46,32
filmgal/49,12,39
fingerbøl/12,47
fix/12,46,6
flerstavelsesord/12,46,6
flikflak/12,47
flygtig/24,12,49
fodfejl/12,4,46
fodtrin/12,47
fordomsfuld/49,12,39
forfang/12,46,6
forhjulstræk/12,47
forlængerrør/12,46,6
formeringsdygtig/24,12,49
forsorgshjem/12,47
forsvarsforbund/12,46,6
forsømmelig/24,12,49
forældrepar/12,47,32
fravær/12,46,6
fredsommelig/24,12,49
fribeløb/12,46,6
fripas/12,47
frisbee/50
frontalangreb/12,46,6
fruebær/12,48
frygtløs/49,12,39
fængselsophold/12,46,6
færdig/25,12,49,32
fødselstal/12,47
galmyg/12,48
galnebær/12,48
gangsterfilm/12,4,46
gårdrum/12,47
gemen/49,12,39
gennembrudsforsøg/12,46,6
gestus/12,48
gevind/12,46,6,32
giftfri/49,12,39
gimmerlam/12,47
gladiolus/12,48
gnaveben/12,46,6
granatrød/49,12,39
granitbrud/12,47
grin/12,46,6
gulaks/12,4,46
guldgul/49,12,39
hagekorsflag/12,46,6
hak/12,47
halvdød/49,12,39
håndgreb/12,46,6
handicap/12,47,32
handlekraftig/24,12,49
hårlag/12,46,6
havregryn/12,46,6
hedvinsglas/12,47,32
heltemodig/24,12,49
hestesko/12,4,46,32
hesteskosøm/12,47
hibiscus/12,48
hjem/12,47,32
hjemmesko/12,4,46
homofil/49,12,39
hors/12,46,6
hugormebid/12,47
hushøj/49,12,39
huslån/12,46,6
højdeindstillelig/24,12,49
højttaleranlæg/12,47
høslæt/12,48
idealsamfund/12,46,6
ikkeboglig/24,12,49
indekstal/12,47
indgift/49,12,39
indstik/12,47
infusionsdyr/12,46,6
intens/49,12,39
islæt/12,48
jernholdig/24,12,49
joggingsæt/12,47
jordbær/12,48,32
jordskælv/12,46,6
kalkbrud/12,47
kanelbrun/49,12,39
kantebånd/12,46,6
kardanled/12,47
kirsebær/12,48,32
kirsebærrød/49,12,39
klap/12,47
klidbrød/12,46,6
kloakanlæg/12,47
knækæg/12,47
knælang/49,12,39
kohorn/12,46,6
kokos/12,48,32
konkurrencedygtig/24,12,49
koteletfisk/12,4,46
kradsbørstig/24,12,49
kraftoverskud/12,47
krokodillenæb/12,47
krumspring/12,46,6
kulholdig/24,12,49
kvalkved/12,48
kvindfolk/12,46,6
kys/12,47,32
kæmpemæssig/25,12,49
lån/12,46,6
landanlæg/12,47
langmodig/24,12,49
lapsus/12,48
lathyrus/12,48
lavineskred/12,47
ledmus/12,4,46
letfordærvelig/24,12,49
livagtig/24,12,49
livsbegær/12,46,6
lixtal/12,47
lotus/12,48,32
lp/50
luftformig/24,12,49
luseæg/12,47
lysforhold/12,46,6
lysstærk/49,12,39
løvspring/12,46,6
madmæssig/25,12,49
makkerpar/12,47
malariamyg/12,48
mangfoldig/24,12,49
marksten/12,4,46
maskinrum/12,47
mellemkirkelig/25,12,49
mellemled/12,47
metasprog/12,46,6
mikrochip/12,48,32
mild/49,12,39
miljøanlæg/12,47
mixture/12,4,46
moderløs/49,12,39
modtryk/12,47
morgenrød/49,12,39
mosekonebryg/12,48
myg/12,48
myreæg/12,47
mærkeår/12,46,6
møjsommelig/24,12,49
navneforbud/12,47
navnløs/49,12,39
nedkast/12,46,6
normsæt/12,47
nydelig/24,12,49
nævn/12,46,6
nødstrømsanlæg/12,47
nøglefærdig/24,12,49
omklædningsrum/12,47
opak/24,12,49
opkog/12,46,6
oplagstal/12,47
ordret/59,12,49
output/12,47
overklasseløg/12,46,6
overrislingsanlæg/12,47
overstadig/24,12,49
papirklip/12,47
påskebryg/12,48
passus/12,48
pavelig/24,12,49
peg/12,46,6
pensionstillæg/12,47
plaf/12,47
plantesamfund/12,46,6
populærvidenskabelig/24,12,49
prinsepar/12,47
præstationssamfund/12,46,6
pueril/49,12,39
pur/12,47,32
rag/12,48
ran/12,46,6
rat/12,47,32
rawlplug/12,48
rejseklar/49,12,39
rekonvalescenthjem/12,47
retsbrud/12,47
retskrav/12,46,6
roulettespil/12,47
rubinrød/49,12,39
rulleski/12,4,46
rødnæb/12,48
sagsanlæg/12,47
saltvandsfisk/12,4,46
sammenklappelig/24,12,49
sammensætningsled/12,47
schweizerfranc/12,4,46
servantestel/12,47
silkeglat/59,12,49
singrøn/12,48
skatteål/12,4,46
skel/12,47
skred/12,47
skrog/12,46,6
skudklar/49,12,39
skvæt/12,47
slidlag/12,46,6
slik/12,47
slum/12,48,32
slæt/12,48
småtryk/12,47
smertelig/24,12,49
smæld/12,46,6
soldaterhjem/12,47
soundtrack/12,46,6
spillemæssig/24,12,49
spot/12,48
spædbørnshjem/12,47
stag/12,46,6,32
stesolid/49,12,39
stikkelsbær/12,48,32
stinkdyr/12,46,6
stjerneanis/12,48
stod/12,47
storkenæb/12,48
strip/12,48
studenterbrød/12,46,6
subversiv/49,12,39
svedjebrug/12,46,6
svup/12,47
syrlig/24,12,49
søliv/12,46,6
tankanlæg/12,47
tavl/12,46,6
terminal/25,12,49
tilflugtsrum/12,47
tilknytningsforhold/12,46,6
trang/49,12,39
transferbeløb/12,46,6
trek/12,47
turnips/12,4,46
tv-rum/12,47
tysknational/49,12,39
tyttebær/12,48
ubrydelig/24,12,49
udendørsliv/12,46,6
udlæg/12,47
uforsonlig/24,12,49
ukuelig/24,12,49
ulivssår/12,46,6
universitær/49,12,39
uppercut/12,48
usanselig/24,12,49
uudsigelig/24,12,49
vanskud/12,47
vejrbestandig/24,12,49
venstrefløjsfolk/12,46,6
